Hawaii, session 2026, HB1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 184, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§184- State parks; Hawaii-born individuals; Native Hawaiians; resident fees.  (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, but subject to subsection (b), any Hawaii-born or Native Hawaiian individual shall qualify for resident fees at state parks, regardless of where the individual currently resides. (b) An individual seeking to qualify for fees pursuant to this section shall first present to the department: (1)  A birth certificate establishing the individual's birth within the State and a government-issued photographic identification card; (2)  A birth certificate establishing the individual's Native Hawaiian ancestry and a government-issued photographic identification card; or (3)  A Native Hawaiian registration card issued by the office of Hawaiian affairs; as applicable. (c) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________